test/src/dict-gt-yamls/N-Clex_morces_dict-gt-norm.gen.yaml
Config:
  hfst:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.hfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.hfst
  xerox:
    Gen: ../../../src/generator-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    Morph: ../../../src/analyser-dict-gt-norm.xfst
    App: lookup

Tests:

  Noun - morčes: # MLO, ok
    morčes+N+Sg+Nom: moˊrčes
    morčes+N+Sg+Gen: morččá
    morčes+N+Sg+Acc: morččá
    morčes+N+Sg+Ill: morččás
    morčes+N+Sg+Loc: morččást
    morčes+N+Sg+Com: morččáin
    morčes+N+Sg+Abe: moˊrčáttáá
    morčes+N+Ess: moˊrčesin
    morčes+N+Par: moˊrčesid
    morčes+N+Pl+Nom: morččáh
    morčes+N+Pl+Gen: morččái
    morčes+N+Pl+Acc: morččáid
    morčes+N+Pl+Ill: morččáid
    morčes+N+Pl+Loc: morččáin
    morčes+N+Pl+Com: moˊrčáiguin
    morčes+N+Pl+Abe: moˊrčáittáá

  Noun - niskes: # MLO, ok
    niskes+N+Sg+Nom: niˊskes
    niskes+N+Sg+Gen: niská
    niskes+N+Sg+Acc: niská
    niskes+N+Sg+Ill: niskás
    niskes+N+Sg+Loc: niskást
    niskes+N+Sg+Com: niskáin
    niskes+N+Sg+Abe: niˊskáttáá
    niskes+N+Ess: niˊskesin
    niskes+N+Par: niˊskesid
    niskes+N+Pl+Nom: niskáh
    niskes+N+Pl+Gen: niskái
    niskes+N+Pl+Acc: niskáid
    niskes+N+Pl+Ill: niskáid
    niskes+N+Pl+Loc: niskáin
    niskes+N+Pl+Com: niˊskáiguin
    niskes+N+Pl+Abe: niˊskáittáá

  Noun - peles+v1: # MLO, ok
    peles+v1+N+Sg+Nom: peˊles
    peles+v1+N+Sg+Gen: piälˊlá
    peles+v1+N+Sg+Acc: piälˊlá
    peles+v1+N+Sg+Ill: piälˊlás
    peles+v1+N+Sg+Loc: piälˊlást
    peles+v1+N+Sg+Com: piälˊláin
    peles+v1+N+Sg+Abe: piälˊláttáá
    peles+v1+N+Ess: peˊlesin
    peles+v1+N+Par: peˊlesid
    peles+v1+N+Pl+Nom: piälˊláh
    peles+v1+N+Pl+Gen: piälˊlái
    peles+v1+N+Pl+Acc: piälˊláid
    peles+v1+N+Pl+Ill: piälˊláid
    peles+v1+N+Pl+Loc: piälˊláin
    peles+v1+N+Pl+Com: piälˊláiguin
    peles+v1+N+Pl+Abe: piälˊláittáá
    
  Noun - peles+v2: # MLO, ok
    peles+v2+N+Sg+Nom: peˊles
    peles+v2+N+Sg+Gen: piälˊlás
    peles+v2+N+Sg+Acc: piälˊlás
    peles+v2+N+Sg+Ill: piäˊḷásân
    peles+v2+N+Sg+Loc: piäˊḷásist
    peles+v2+N+Sg+Com: piäˊḷásáin
    peles+v2+N+Sg+Abe: piälˊlásttáá
    peles+v2+N+Ess: peˊlesin
    peles+v2+N+Par: peˊlesid
    peles+v2+N+Pl+Nom: piäˊḷáseh
    peles+v2+N+Pl+Gen: piäˊḷásij
    peles+v2+N+Pl+Acc: piäˊḷásijd
    peles+v2+N+Pl+Ill: piäˊḷásáid
    peles+v2+N+Pl+Loc: piäˊḷásijn
    peles+v2+N+Pl+Com: piäˊḷásijguin
    peles+v2+N+Pl+Abe: piäˊḷásijttáá
